dictsource/vi_rules
.group o
        o          O
        oa         o@        // modify oa sound  example: hoa,khoa // o (A       w
        oà         o@2
        oá         o@3
        oả         o@4
        oã         o@5
        oạ         o@6
		oao         wa:w        // modify oa sound  example: hoa,khoa // o (A       w
        oào         wa:w2
        oáo         wa:w3
        oảo         wa:w4
        oão         wa:w5
        oạo         wa:w6
		oay         waj        // modify oa sound  example: hoa,khoa // o (A       w
        oày         waj2
        oáy         waj3
        oảy         waj4
        oãy         waj5
        oạy         waj6
        oo         O
        oi         OI
        oì         OI2
        oí         OI3
        oỉ         OI4
        oĩ         OI5
        oị         OI6
        ong        O#N
        oe         wE        // Adding  oe sound  example: lóe sáng,toét mắt
		oai        wa:I        // oai sound
        o (@       _^_EN
        oại        wa:I6
        oài        wa:I2
        oái        wa:I3
        oải        wa:I4
        oãi        wa:I5
        oă         wa1
        oằ         wa2
        oắ         wa3
        oẳ         wa4
        oẵ         wa5
        oặ         wa6
		oc		   O#k
		oanh	   we-n^
		oành       we-n^2
        oánh       we-n^3
        oảnh       we-n^4
        oãnh       we-n^5
        oạnh       we-n^6
		oach		we-c
		oách		we-c3
		oạch		we-c6
		

.group ò
        ò          O2
        òi         OI2
        òa         o@2       //ò (A       w2
        òng        O#N2
        òe         wE2
        
 
        
 
        
 

.group ó
        ó          O3
        ói         OI3
        óa         o@3       //ó (A       w3
        óng        O#N3
        óe         wE3
        óc		   O#3k
 
        
 
        
 

.group ỏ
        ỏ          O4
        ỏi         OI4
        ỏa         o@4       //ỏ (A       w4
        ỏng        O#N4
        ỏe         wE4
        
 
        
 
        
 

.group õ
        õ          O5
        õi         OI5
        õa         o@5       //õ (A       w5
        õng        O#N5
        õe         wE5
        
 
        
 
        
 

.group ọ
        ọ          O6
        ọi         OI6
        ọa         o@6       //ọ (A       w6
        ọng        O#N6
        ọe         wE6
        ọc		   O#6k
 
        
 
        
 
//=============================
        
 

.group ô
        ô          o
        ôi         oI
        ông        o#N        // ông sound
?2      ôi         O-        //south dialect 
        ôc		   o#k
 

.group ồ
        ồ          o2
        ồi         oI2
        ồng        o#N2
?2      ồi         O-2       
        
 
        
 

.group ố
        ố          o3
        ối         oI3
        ống        o#N3
?2      ối         O-3       
        ốc		   o#3k
 
        
 

.group ổ
        ổ          o4
        ổi         oI4
        ổng        o#N4
?2      ổi         O-4       
        
 
        
 

.group ỗ
        ỗ          o5
        ỗi         oI5
        ỗng        o#N5
        
 
?2      ỗi         O-5
        
 

.group ộ
        ộ          o6
        ội         oI6
        ộng        o#N6
?2      ội         O-6       
        ộc         o#6k
 
        
 
//=============================
        
 

.group ơ
        ơ          @:
        ơi         @:I
        ơu         @:U
?2      ơi         @-        //south dialect 
        
 
        
 

.group ờ
        ờ          @:2
        ời         @:I2
        ờu         @:U2
?2      ời         @-2       
        
 
        
 

.group ớ
        ớ          @:3
        ới         @:I3
        ớu         @:U3
?2      ới         @-3       
        
 
        
 

.group ở
        ở          @:4
        ởi         @:I4
        ởu         @:U4
?2      ởi         @-4       
        
 
        
 

.group ỡ
        ỡ          @:5
        ỡi         @:I5
        ỡu         @:U5
?2      ỡi         @-5       
        
 
        
 

.group ợ
        ợ          @:6
        ợi         @:I6
        ợu         @:U6
?2      ợi         @-6       
        
 
        
 
//=============================
        
 

.group u
        u          u
        u (A       w
     A) u          w
	 gi) u 			u
        ui         uI
        uì         uI2
        uí         uI3
        uỉ         uI4
        uĩ         uI5
        uị         uI6
        ua         u@
        uà         u@2
        uá         u@3
        uả         u@4
        uã         u@5
        uạ         u@6
        uô         u@
        uồ         u@2
        uố         u@3
        uổ         u@4
        uỗ         u@5
        uộ         u@6
        uôi        u@j
        uồi        u@j2
        uối        u@j3
        uổi        u@j4
        uỗi        u@j5
        uội        u@j6
        //ung        u#
        u (L01     _^_EN
        u (@       _^_EN
       // ua (L01    _^_EN
?2      u          u-        
 

.group ù
        ù          u2
        ù (A       u2
		ùy         ui2
        ùi         uI2
        ùa         u@2
		//ùng        u#2
        
 
?2      ù          u-2       
        
 

.group ú
        ú          u3
        ú (A       u3
		úy		   ui3
        úi         uI3
        úa         u@3
		//úng        u#3
?2      ú          u-3       
        
 
        
 

.group ủ
        ủ          u4
        ủ (A       u4
		ủy  	   ui4
        ủi         uI4
        ủa         u@4
		//ủng        u#4
        
 
?2      ủ          u-4       
        
 

.group ũ
        ũ          u5
        ũ (A       u5
		ũy         ui5
        ũi         uI5
        ũa         u@5
		//ũng        u#5
?2      ũ          u-5       
        
 
        
 

.group ụ
        ụ          u6
        ụ (A       u6
		ụy         ui6
        ụi         uI6
        ụa         u@6
		//ụng        u#6
?2      ụ          u-6       
        
 
//=============================
        
 

.group ư
        ư          y
        ưi         yI
        ưa         y@
        ươ         y@
        ườ         y@2
        ướ         y@3
        ưở         y@4
        ưỡ         y@5
        ượ         y@6
        ưu         yw
        ươi        y@j
        ười        y@j2
        ưới        y@j3
        ưởi        y@j4
        ưỡi        y@j5
        ượi        y@j6
        ươu        y@w
        ườu        y@w2
        ướu        y@w3
        ưởu        y@w4
        ưỡu        y@w5
        ượu        y@w6
        
 
        
 
        
 

.group ừ
        ừ          y2
        ừi         yI2
        ừa         y@2
        ừu         y2w2
        
 
        
 
        
 

.group ứ
        ứ          y3
        ứi         yI3
        ứa         y@3
        ứu         y3w3
        
 
        
 
        
 

.group ử
        ử          y4
        ửi         yI4
        ửa         y@4
        ửu         y4w4
        
 
        
 
        
 

.group ữ
        ữ          y5
        ữi         yI5
        ữa         y@5
        ữu         y5w5
        
 
        
 
        
 

.group ự
        ự          y6
        ựi         yI6
        ựa         y@6
        ựu         y6w6
        
 
        
 
//=============================
        
 

.group y
        y          i
       // y (A       j
        ya         i@
        yà         i@2
        yá         i@3
        yả         i@4
        yã         i@5
        yạ         i@6
        yê         iE
        yề         iE2
        yế         iE3
        yể         iE4
        yễ         iE5
        yệ         iE6
      //  yêu        i@U        
        y (L01     _^_EN
    bu) y          _^_EN

.group ỳ
        ỳ          i2
        ỳ (A       j2
        ỳa         i@2
        
 
        
 
        
 

.group ý
        ý          i3
        ý (A       j3
        ýa         i@3
        
 
        
 
        
 

.group ỷ
        ỷ          i4
        ỷ (A       j4
        ỷa         i@4
        
 
        
 
        
 

.group ỹ
        ỹ          i5
        ỹ (A       j5
        ỹa         i@5
        
 
        
 
        
 

.group ỵ
        ỵ          i6
        ỵ (A       j6
        ỵa         i@6
        
 
        
 
//=============================
        
 

.group 0xce   // Greek letters
// 0xce is the first byte of the utf-8 code for these characters
        
 
        
 
        α          a:1n_|f'a:1
        ά          a:1n_|f'a:1
        β          b'e1_|t['a:1
        γ          Q'a:1_|m'a:1
        δ          J'E1n_|t['a:1
        ε          E1p_|s'i1_|l'O1n
        έ          E1p_|s'i1_|l'O1n
        ζ          D'e1_|t['a:1
        η          e1_|t['a:1
        ή          e1_|t['a:1
        θ          t'e1_|t['a:1
        ι          i1_|'o1_|t['a:1
        ί          i1_|'o1_|t['a:1
        κ          k'a:1p_|p'a:1
        λ          l'a1m_|_d'a:1
        μ          mw'i1
        ν          nw'i1
        ξ          s'i7
        ο          o1_|m'i1_|kz.'O7n
        
 
        
 
        
 

.group 0xcf   // Greek letters
        
 
        
 
        π          p'i1
        ρ          z.'o1
        σ          s'i3c_|m'a:1
        ς          s'i3c_|m'a:1
        τ          t['o1
        υ          u1p_|s'i1_|l'O1n
        ύ          u1p_|s'i1_|l'O1n
        φ          f'i1
        χ          c'i1
        ψ          ps'i1
        ω          o1_|m'e1_|Q'a:7
        ώ          o1_|m'e1_|Q'a:7
        ό          o1_|m'i1_|kz.'O7n
        
 
        
 
        
 
        
 
        
 

.group
        %          f'@2n||tS'am
        !          _:tS'@3m_|t'a:7n_:
        ! (\!      
//            :            koUl@n
    D_) h (_DD_    D'@:2     // omit colon in time, eg: 2:30
        $          d'o||l'a
        !=         x'o#_|_b'a2N_
        >=         l'@:3n_|h'@:1n_|hw,a6kh_b'a2N
        <=         n^'O4_|h'@:1n_|hw,a6kh_b'a2N
        
 
        
 
    __) - (_D      tS'y2
    A_) - (_D      _
    C_) - (_D      _
        
 
        .          tS'@3m_
        . (.       _:
    \.) .          
        
 
